Montana, session 2025, HB877.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Short title. [Sections 1 and 2] may be cited as the "Montana Data Center
Development Act".

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Policy and intent. (1) October 1, 2007, marked the end of deregulation
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 877

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 877.1
in the state, which eliminated customer choice for electricity supply and initiated the rebuilding of certain public
utilities into vertically integrated enterprises.
(2) The end of deregulation in the state eliminated customer choice in electric supply while
preserving the choices that had been made by customers in existence on or before October 1, 2007.
(3) The public service commission has an important role in determining how large electric
customer needs are met, but that role does not extend to prohibiting large electric customers from obtaining
service from certain public utilities.
(4) It is the legislature's intent to clarify the commission's role and to clarify how new, large
customers may obtain electric service in order to address the opportunities and challenges that new, large
loads present, particularly with the rapid emergence of data centers and other large-scale energy consumers.

Section 3. Section 69-8-201, MCA, is amended to read:
"69-8-201. Public utility -- customer electricity supply service options and requirements --
exemption. (1) (a) Except as provided in subsections (1)(b) and (1)(c) through 1(e), a retail customer that
existed on or before October 1, 2007, that has an individual load with an average monthly demand of greater
than or equal to 5,000 kilowatts, and that is not purchasing electricity supply service from a public utility on
October 1, 2007, may not purchase electricity supply service from a public utility.
(b) A retail customer referred to in subsection (1)(a) may request electricity supply service from the
public utility, and the public utility shall provide electricity supply service if the retail customer demonstrates that
the provision of electricity supply service to the retail customer will not adversely impact the public utility's other
customers over the long term as determined by the commission.
(c) If a public utility provides electricity supply service to a retail customer as provided in
subsection (1)(b), that service is regulated by the commission and the customer may not, at a later date,
purchase electricity supply service from another provider of electricity supply service.
(d) The commission may not prohibit a public utility from providing service to a retail customer that
came into existence after October 1, 2007, and that has an individual load with an average monthly demand of
greater than or equal to 5,000 kilowatts.
(e) Nothing in this subsection (1) prohibits the commission from establishing tariffs and regulatory
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 877

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 877.1
processes consistent with its regulation of public utilities under Title 69, chapter 3.
(2) (a) A retail customer that existed on or before October 1, 2007, that has an individual load with
an average monthly demand of less than 5,000 kilowatts, and that is not purchasing electricity from a public
utility on October 1, 2007, may continue to purchase electricity from an electricity supplier. The retail customer
may subsequently purchase electricity from a public utility subject to commission rule or order, but the customer
may not, at a later date, choose to purchase electricity from another source.
(b) A retail customer that has an individual load with an average monthly demand of less than
5,000 kilowatts and that is currently purchasing electricity from a public utility may not choose to purchase
electricity from another source after October 1, 2007.
(3) Nothing in this section affects a retail customer's rights and obligations with respect to net
metering, cogeneration, self-generation, or ancillary sales of electricity related to deviations from scheduled
energy deliveries from nonutility suppliers, as may be provided for in law, commission rule or order, or a tariff
approved by the public service commission or the federal energy regulatory commission.
(4) (a) Except as provided in 69-5-101, 69-5-102, 69-5-104(2), 69-5-105 through 69-5-112, 69-8-
402, 69-8-421, and subsection (4)(b) of this section, a public utility currently doing business in Montana as part
of a single integrated multistate operation, no portion of which lies within the basin of the Columbia River, is
exempt from the requirements of this chapter.
(b) To the extent that a public utility described in subsection (4)(a) becomes the successor in
interest of another public utility that has restructured in accordance with this chapter before October 1, 2007, it
is subject to the requirements of this chapter with respect to the service area of the acquired public utility."

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Appropriation. (1) There is appropriated $25,000 from the general fund
to the department of commerce for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, to market Montana as a data center
location.
(2) There is appropriated $25,000 from the general fund to the state energy office within the
department of environmental quality for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, to assist data center developers in
the acquisition of electrical generation resources to serve additional load.

- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 877

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 877.1
NEW SECTION. Section 5. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 and 2] are intended to be codified
as an integral part of Title 69, chapter 8, and the provisions of Title 69, chapter 8, apply to [sections 1 and 2].

NEW SECTION. Section 6. Saving clause. [This act] does not affect rights and duties that matured,
penalties that were incurred, or proceedings that were begun before [the effective date of this act].

NEW SECTION. Section 7. Effective dates. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2), [this act] is
effective on passage and approval.
(2) [Section 4] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 877